Louisiana, session 2026, HB416.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:302.29(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§302.29. Disposition of certain collections in East Baton Rouge Parish
* * *
B. The monies in the East Baton Rouge Parish Community Improvement
Fund shall be subject to an annual appropriation of the legislature. Fifty percent of
the monies in the fund shall be used for urban mass transit in East Baton Rouge
Parish the Greater Baton Rouge Economic Foundation Site Development Fund and
the remaining fifty percent of the monies in the fund shall be used for the Research
Park Corporation domiciled in East Baton Rouge Parish. The funds allocated herein
for urban mass transit shall not be used to displace, replace, or supplant funds
previously appropriated or otherwise used for this purpose. All unexpended and
unencumbered monies remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain
in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested by the treasurer in the same
manner as the monies in the state general fund, and all interest earned shall be
deposited in the state general fund.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1150 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 416
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.